Massachusetts, session 194th, H3124.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition is 
hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following paragraph:- 
(yy) used books and other items sold by libraries and library friends groups for the 
purposes of raising money to be used for library purposes.